Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-591
Class IV school district; treasurer; duties; reports; bond or insurance.

The treasurer of a Class IV school district shall (1) attend all meetings of the board of education when required to do so by the board of education, (2) prepare and submit in writing a monthly report of the state of the finances of the district, (3) pay out school money only upon warrants signed by the president or vice president and countersigned by the associate superintendent of business affairs, and (4) give a bond or evidence of equivalent insurance coverage payable to the school district in a sum fixed by the board of education.

Laws 1917, c. 225, § 13, p. 553;

C.S.1922, § 6622;

C.S.1929, § 79-2613;

R.S.1943, § 79-2613;

Laws 1949, c. 269, § 4, p. 885;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 215, p. 761;

R.S.1943, (1971), § 79-528;

Laws 1971, LB 450, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 84, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-911;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 344;

Laws 2005, LB 380, § 4.